src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
spreaken+V+PrfPrt: **hupmat/puhua/speak**
* *spr%{eio%}%{aØo%}k%^ABL3%>en*
* *sproak0%>en*

* ★*spr%{eio%}%{aØo%}k%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*spr%{eio%}%{aØo%}k0%>en* (is not standard language)

* ★*spr%{eio%}%{aØo%}k%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*spro%{aØo%}k0%>en* (is not standard language)

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-nds/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
